Washington statutes.
RCW 3.02.030

Record of proceedings.

The supreme court may, by court rule, establish a method of making a record of the proceedings of a court of limited jurisdiction for purposes of review.

[ 1980 c 162 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates, savings—Severability—1980 c 162: See notes following RCW 3.02.010.